Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Administrative Dissolution

48-64-201. Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under § 48-64-202 to administratively dissolve a corporation if the:

Corporation does not deliver its properly completed annual report to the secretary of state within two (2) months after it is due;

Corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for two (2) months or more;

Name of a corporation contained in a document filed after the enactment of chapters 51-68 of this title fails to comply with § 48-54-101;

Corporation does not notify the secretary of state within two (2) months that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued;

Corporation's period of duration, if any, stated in its charter expires; or

Corporation submits to the secretary of state's office a check, bank draft, money order or other such instrument, for payment of any fee and it is dishonored upon presentation for payment.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 14.20; 1989, ch. 445, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 96.

48-64-202. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist under § 48-64-201 for dissolving a corporation, the secretary of state shall serve the corporation with written notice of the secretary of state's determination under §§ 48-55-104 and 48-55-105, except that such determination may be sent by first class mail, and in the case of a public benefit corporation, shall notify the attorney general and reporter in writing.

If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within two (2) months after service of the notice is perfected under §§ 48-55-104 and 48-55-105, the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation under §§ 48-55-104 and 48-55-105, except that the certificate may be sent by first class mail.

A corporation administratively dissolved continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any activities except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its assets and affairs under § 48-64-106 and notify claimants under §§ 48-64-107 and 48-64-108.

The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 14.21; 1989, ch. 445, § 13.

48-64-203. Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

A corporation administratively dissolved under § 48-64-202 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement. The application must:

Contain a confirmation of good standing relative to such foreign corporation;

Recite the name of the corporation at its date of dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

State a corporate name that satisfies the requirements of § 48-54-101.

If the secretary of state determines that the application contains the confirmation of good standing and information required by subsection (a), and that such information is correct, then the secretary of state shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites the secretary of state's determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under §§ 48-55-104 and 48-55-105.

If the corporate name in subdivision (a)(4) is different than the corporate name in subdivision (a)(2), the application for reinstatement shall constitute an amendment to the charter insofar as it pertains to the corporate name.

When the reinstatement hereunder or under § 48-64-204 is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution, and the corporation resumes carrying on its activities as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 14.22; 1991, ch. 188, § 9; 1993, ch. 217, § 1; 1999, ch. 117, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, §§ 17, 18; 2011, ch. 99, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-2307.

48-64-204. Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the secretary of state denies a corporation's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the secretary of state shall serve the corporation under §§ 48-55-104 and 48-55-105 with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the chancery court of Davidson County within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the secretary of state's certificate of dissolution, the corporation's application for reinstatement, and the secretary of state's notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 14.23.

48-64-205. Articles of termination following administrative dissolution or revocation.

When a corporation, which has been administratively dissolved or has had its charter revoked, wishes to terminate its corporate existence, it may do so without first being reinstated by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of termination following administrative dissolution or revocation setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date that termination of corporate existence was authorized;

A statement that the resolution authorizing termination was duly adopted by the members or that approval by the members was not required, and that the resolution authorizing termination was adopted by a majority of the board of directors;

A copy of the resolution or the written consent authorizing the termination;

If approval of dissolution by some third person or persons other than the members, directors, or incorporators was required, a statement that such approval was obtained;

If the corporation is a public benefit corporation, a statement that notice to the attorney general and reporter required by § 48-64-103(a) has been given; and

A statement that all the assets of the corporation have been distributed to its creditors and other parties authorized by chapters 51-68 of this title.

If the secretary of state finds that the articles of termination following administrative dissolution or revocation comply with the requirements of subsection (a), and if the articles are accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal, then the secretary of state shall file the articles of termination following administrative dissolution or revocation. Upon such filing, the existence of the corporation shall cease. Unless a claim is barred pursuant to § 48-64-107 or § 48-64-108, the termination of corporate existence shall not take away or impair any remedy to or against the corporation, its directors, officers or members, for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred, prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name. The members, directors, and officers have the power to take such corporate or other action as may be appropriate to protect such remedy, right, or claim.

Acts 1989, ch. 445, § 14; 2010, ch. 741, § 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-2309.

48-64-206. Reinstatement within certain amount of time — Amendment of charter — Application for reinstatement.

A nonprofit corporation that has been administratively dissolved by the expiration of its period of duration may reinstate within one (1) year of the expiration of the period of duration by:

Amending its charter to extend its period of duration or set the period of duration to perpetual; and

Filing an application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution pursuant to § 48-64-203.

Acts 2016, ch. 688, § 4.